da: Kontorforsyning > Arkivering og organisering: Adressebøger; Indbinding – tilbehør; Visitkort – bøger; Visitkort – holdere; Cd/dvd – opbevaring; Kalendere og planlæggere; Kartoteksarkiv; Kartotekskortlommer; Kartotekskortkasser; Brevbakker; Arkivkasser; Arkivmapper; Mapper og rapportomslag; Lykønskningskortholdere; Postsortering; Blyantsholdere; Præsentationsmapper; Opskriftskortkasser
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku: Książki adresowe; Oprawa dokumentów; Wizytowniki; Stojaki na wizytówki; Organizery na płyty; Kalendarze, organizery i terminarze; Fiszki; Koszulki na karty; Kasety na pieniądze; Organizery na biurko; Pudła na dokumenty; Skoroszyty i teczki zawieszane; Teczki i ofertówki; Organizery na kartki okolicznościowe; Sortery przesyłek pocztowych; Pojemniki na przybory piśmiennicze i rysunkowe; Organizery typu portfolio i padfolio; Pudełka na karty z przepisami
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kartotéka a organizácia: Adresáre; Viazacie potreby; Zakladače na vizitky; Stojany na vizitky; Obaly a organizéry na CD/DVD; Kalendáre, organizéry a plánovače; Zakladače kariet; Obaly na karty; Pokladničné boxy; Stolové organizéry; Boxy na spisy; Šanóny na spisy; Obaly na šanóny a záznamy; Organizátori pohľadníc; Triediče pošty; Puzdrá na perá a ceruzky; Fascikle a zápisníky; Boxy na kartičky s receptami
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Archiveren en indelen: Adresboeken; Benodigdheden voor inbinden; Visitekaartjesboeken; Standaarden voor visitekaartjes; Cd-/dvd-organizers; Agenda's, organizers en planners; Kaartbestanden; Kaartenhoezen; Geldkistjes; Bureau-organizers; Archiefdozen; Archiefmappen; Map- en rapportomslagen; Organizers voor wenskaarten; Postsorteerbakjes; Pennen- en potloodhouders; Port- en padfolio's; Receptkaartendozen
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Zlaganje in urejanje dokumentov: Adresarji; Potrebščine za vezavo; Knjige za vizitke; Stojala za vizitke; Etuiji in organizatorji za CD/DVD plošče; Koledarji, organizatorji in planerji; Mape za kartice; Ovitki za kartice; Blagajne; Namizni organizatorji; Škatle za datoteke; Mape za datoteke; Mape in ovitki za poročila; Organizatorji voščilnic; Razvrščevalniki pošte; Etuiji za pisala in svinčnike; Portfelji in poslovne mape; Škatle za kartice z recepti
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αρχειοθέτηση & οργάνωση: Βιβλία διευθύνσεων; Προμήθειες βιβλιοδεσίας; Βιβλία επαγγελματικών καρτών; Βάσεις επαγγελματικών καρτών; Θήκες & οργανωτές CD/DVD; Ημερολόγια, οργανωτές & προγραμματιστές; Αρχεία καρτών; Θήκες καρτών (Card Sleeves); Κουτιά μετρητών; Οργανωτές γραφείου; Κουτιά αρχείων; Φάκελοι αρχείων; Καλύμματα φακέλων & αναφορών; Οργανωτές ευχετήριων καρτών; Διαλογείς αλληλογραφίας; Θήκες για στυλό & μολύβια; Χαρτοφύλακες & padfolios; Κουτιά καρτών συνταγών
hu: Irodai kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés: Címjegyzékek; Kötőkellékek; Névjegykártyakönyvek; Névjegykártyaállványok; CD/DVD-tokok és szervezők; Naptárak, szervezők és tervezők; Kártyafájlok; Kártyahüvelyek; Pénzdobozok; Asztalrendezők; Fájldobozok; Fájlmappák; Mappák és jelentésborítók; Üdvözlőlap-szervezők; Levélválogatók; Toll- és ceruzatartók; Portfóliók és mappák; Receptkártyadobozok
it: Forniture per ufficio > Archiviazione e organizzazione: Rubriche; Forniture per rilegature; Raccoglitori di biglietti da visita; Espositori per biglietti da visita; Porta CD/DVD; Calendari, portaoggetti e agende; Schedari; Custodie per schede; Cassette portavalori; Portaoggetti da scrivania; Scatole archivio; Cartellette; Cartellette e copertine per documenti; Organizer biglietti auguri; Organizzatori per posta; Portapenne e portamatite; Cartelle e portablocco; Scatole per ricette
ja: オフィス用品 > ファイル・バインダー: アドレス帳; バインダー・製本用品; 名刺ホルダー; 名刺スタンド; CD・DVDケース; カレンダー・手帳; カード用ファイル; カードスリーブ; 手提げ金庫; デスクオーガナイザー; ファイルボックス; ファイルフォルダー; フォルダー・レポートカバー; グリーティングカードホルダー; 郵便分類ケース; 筆箱・ペンケース; 書類ケース・ノートパッド付きファイル; レシピカード収納ケース
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Dosyalama ve Organizasyon: Adres Defterleri; Ciltleme Malzemeleri; Kartvizit Defterleri; Kartvizitlikler; CD'lik ve DVD'likler; Takvimler, Organizerler ve Planlayıcılar; Kart Dosyaları; Kart Zarfları; Para Kutuları; Masaüstü Düzenleyicileri; Dosya Kutuları; Dosya Klasörleri; Klasörler ve Sunum Dosyaları; Tebrik Kartı Düzenleyicileri; Posta Tasnif Rafları; Kalem Kutuları; Portfolyo Dosyaları ve Bloknotlu Dosyalar; Yemek Tarif Kartı Kutuları
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Arkistointi ja järjestys: Osoitekirjat; Kansiotarvikkeet; Käyntikorttikirjat; Käyntikorttitelineet; CD-/DVD-kotelot ja -säilytys; Kalenterit, säilytys ja suunnittelutyökalut; Kortistot; Korttisuojat; Käteislaatikot; Työpöydän säilytysratkaisut; Arkistolaatikot; Arkistokansiot; Kansiot ja muovitaskut; Tervehdyskorttien säilytys; Postin lajittelulaatikot; Kynäkotelot; Kansiot ja pikkukansiot; Reseptilaatikot
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Kẹp tài liệu và ngăn chia tài liệu: Sổ địa chỉ; Kẹp tài liệu; Sổ đựng danh thiếp; Giá đựng danh thiếp; Hộp đựng đĩa CD/DVD; Lịch, bản kế hoạch và lịch trình; Hộp/sổ đựng danh thiếp/thẻ; Bao đựng thẻ; Hộp đựng tiền; Khay đựng tài liệu để bàn; Hộp đựng tài liệu; Ngăn đựng tài liệu; Tập đựng hồ sơ; Hộp đựng thiệp; Khay sắp xếp tài liệu; Hộp bút & bút chì; Cặp đựng hồ sơ; Hộp đựng thẻ ghi công thức nấu ăn
de: Bürobedarf > Ablage & Organisation: Adressbücher; Bindesysteme; Visitenkartenbücher; Visitenkarten-Ständer; CD-/DVD-Ordnungssysteme; Kalender, Organizer & Zeitplaner; Karteikästen; Kartenhüllen; Geldkassetten; Schreibtischorganizer; Aktenaufbewahrungsboxen; Register- & Hängemappen; Aktenhüllen und Klemmhefter; Postkartenorganizer; Postsortiersysteme; Federmappen; Akten- & Schreibmappen; Rezeptkästen
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Classement et organisation: Carnets d’adresses; Matériel de reliure; Porte-cartes de visite; Supports pour cartes de visite; Boîtiers et organiseurs pour CD et DVD; Calendriers, organiseurs et agendas; Boîtes à fiches; Pochettes pour cartes; Caisses à monnaie; Organisateurs de bureau; Boîtes de classement; Chemises de classement; Chemises et protèges-reports; Systèmes de rangement pour cartes de vœux; Trieurs de courrier; Étuis à crayons et stylos; Portfolios et Conférenciers; Boîtes à recettes de cuisine
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Pohrana i organizacija: Adresari; Pribor za uvez; Knjižice za posjetnice; Stalci za posjetnice; CD/DVD kutije i organizatori; Kalendari, rokovnici i planeri; Kartoteke; Košuljice za kartice; Kutije za novac; Stolni organizatori; Kutije za datoteke; Fascikli; Mape i omoti za dokumente; Kutija za čestitke; Organizatori za poštu; Pernice; Portfelji i padfoliji; Kutije za kartice s receptima
nb: Kontormateriell > Arkivering og organisering: Adressebøker; Ringpermutstyr; Bøker til visittkort; Stativer til visittkort; CD/DVD-vesker og organiserere; Kalendere og planleggere; Kortarkiverere; Kortlommer; Kontantbokser; Skrivebordsorganiserere; Arkiveringsbokser; Arkiveringsmapper; Mapper og rapportcovere; Organisering av gratulasjonskort; Postsorteringsutstyr; Penn- og blyantpennaler; Portfolioer og padfolioer; Oppskriftskortesker
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Arkiv och organisering: Adressböcker; Pärmmaterial; Visitkortsböcker; Visitkortsställ; CD- och DVD-förvaring; Kalendrar och planeringskalendrar; Kortregister; Kortfickor; Kassaskrin; Organisation för skrivbordet; Arkivlådor; Arkivmappar; Mappar och rapportomslag; Organisering av gratulationskort; Brevsorterare; Pennskrin; Dokumentportföljer och skrivportföljer; Receptkortlådor
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Органайзеры и товары для хранения документов: Адресные записные книжки; Товары для брошюровки; Папки для визиток; Подставки для визиток; Футляры и органайзеры для CD- и DVD-дисков; Календари, органайзеры и планировщики; Картотеки; Файлы и кармашки для карточек; Денежные ящики; Органайзеры для рабочих столов; Коробки для хранения документов; Файловые папки; Папки для документов; Органайзеры для поздравительных открыток; Органайзеры для сортировки почты; Пеналы для ручек и карандашей; Деловые папки; Коробки для карточек с рецептами
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Arquivamento e organização: Agendas de endereços; Suprimentos para encadernação; Organizadores de cartões de visita; Suportes para cartões de visitas; Organizadores para CDs/DVDs; Calendários, organizadores e agendas; Arquivos de cartão; Capas de plástico para cartões; Caixas para dinheiro; Organizadores de escrivaninhas; Caixas para arquivar; Pastas para arquivos; Capas para pastas e relatórios; Organizadores de cartões comemorativos; Organizadores de cartas; Estojos de caneta e lápis; Pastas de convenção; Caixas de receitas
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Clasare și organizare: Agende cu adrese; Materiale pentru legat; Carnete cu cărți de vizită; Suporturi pentru cărți de vizită; Carcase și organizatoare pentru CD/DVD; Calendare, organizatoare și agende de planificare; Dosare din carton; Manșoane din carton; Cutii pentru numerar; Organizatoare pentru birou; Cutii pentru fișiere; Dosare de fișiere; Dosare și coperți de rapoarte; Organizatoare pentru felicitări; Sortatoare de corespondență; Penare pentru pixuri și creioane; Portofolii și caiete de notițe; Cutii pentru cartonașe cu rețete
es: Material de oficina > Clasificación y organización: Libretas de direcciones; Materiales de encuadernación; Libros para tarjetas de presentación; Bases para tarjetas de visita; Organizadores y cajas de CD/DVD; Calendarios, organizadores y agendas; Archivadores para tarjetas; Fundas para tarjetas; Cajas de caudales; Organizadores de escritorio; Cajas de archivo; Carpetas para archivos; Cubiertas para informes y carpetas; Organizadores de tarjetas de felicitación; Clasificadoras de correo; Estuches; Portafolios; Archivadores de recetas
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů: Adresáře; Vázací potřeby; Alba na vizitky; Stojany na vizitky; Krabičky, obaly a pořadače na CD/DVD; Kalendáře, diáře a plánovače; Kartotéční karty; Obaly na kartičky; Pokladní skříňky; Pořadače; Pořádací krabice; Pořádací složky; Obaly na pořadače a dokumenty; Organizéry na blahopřání; Třídiče pošty; Penály a obaly na pera; Aktovky a desky na papíry; Pořadače na recepty
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Bylų saugojimas ir tvarkymas: Adresų knygos; Įrišimo reikmenys; Vizitinių kortelių knygelės; Vizitinių kortelių stovai; CD / DVD dėklai ir laikikliai; Kalendoriai, darbo knygos ir planuokliai; Kartotekos; Kortelių įmautės; Pinigų dėžutės; Staliniai reikmenų laikikliai; Bylų dėžės; Bylų aplankai; Aplankai ir ataskaitų viršeliai; Sveikinimo atvirukų laikikliai; Laiškų rūšiavimo laikikliai; Rašiklių ir pieštukų laikikliai; Portfeliai ir dėklai dokumentams; Receptų kortelių dėžutės
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 文件整理: 通讯录; 装订用品; 名片册; 名片架; 光盘收纳; 日程本; 卡片收纳; 卡套; 现金柜; 桌面文具盘; 档案盒; 文件夹; 文件夹/报告夹; 贺卡收纳; 信件分类装置; 钢笔/铅笔盒; 经理夹/多功能文件夹; 食谱卡盒
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Arquivo e organização: Livros de endereços; Acessórios de encadernação; Caderno para cartões-de-visita; Expositores de cartões-de-visita; Estojos e organizadores para CD/DVD; Calendários, organizadores e planificadores; Arquivos para cartões; Bolsas para cartões; Cofres; Organizadores de secretária; Caixas para arquivos; Pastas de arquivo; Capas para pastas e relatórios; Organizadores para cartões de felicitações; Organizadores de correio; Estojos para canetas e lápis; Porta-documentos e porta-documentos com bloco; Caixas para recibos
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Картотека и организация: Адресни книги; Консумативи за подвързване; Класьори за визитки; Поставки за визитки; Калъфи и органайзери за CD/DVD; Календари, органайзери и планери; Картотеки; Пластмасови джобове за карти; Кутии за съхранение на пари; Органайзери за бюро; Кутии за папки; Класьори за папки; Корици за папки и доклади; Органайзери за поздравителни картички; Сортировачи на поща; Несесери за химикали и моливи; Калъфи и конферентни папки; Кутии с карти с рецепти
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 收納整理用品: 通訊錄; 裝訂用品; 名片冊; 名片臺; CD/DVD 收納用品; 日曆/手帳/日誌; 卡片檔案; 卡套; 錢鈔收納盒; 桌面收納用品; 文件收納盒; 檔案夾/文件袋; 檔案夾/資料夾; 卡片收納盒; 郵件分類櫃; 鉛筆盒; 檔案冊; 食譜卡盒
ko: 사무용품 > 서류 정리 용품: 주소록; 바인더 용품; 명함집; 명함꽂이; CD 및 DVD 케이스/정리함; 달력/수첩/계획표; 카드 정리 파일; 카드 보관함; 현금 보관함; 책상 정리함; 서류함; 파일 폴더; 서류철/보고서 커버; 카드 정리함; 우편물 분류함; 필통; 포트폴리오/패드폴리오; 레시피 카드함
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > การจัดเก็บเอกสารและการจัดระเบียบ: สมุดที่อยู่; อุปกรณ์เข้าเล่ม; สมุดนามบัตร; ที่ตั้งนามบัตร; ที่ใส่และที่จัดระเบียบ CD/DVD; ปฏิทิน สมุดบันทึกและวางแผนงาน; ไฟล์การ์ด; ซองการ์ด; กล่องใส่เงิน; ที่จัดระเบียบโต๊ะทำงาน; กล่องใส่แฟ้มเอกสาร; แฟ้มเก็บเอกสาร; แฟ้มและปกรายงาน; ที่จัดระเบียบบัตรอวยพร; อุปกรณ์จัดเก็บเอกสาร; ที่ใส่ปากกาและดินสอ; พอร์ตโฟลิโอและแพ็ดโฟลิโอ; กล่องใส่การ์ดสูตรอาหาร
en: Office Supplies > Filing & Organization: Address Books; Binding Supplies; Business Card Books; Business Card Stands; CD/DVD Cases & Organizers; Calendars, Organizers & Planners; Card Files; Card Sleeves; Cash Boxes; Desk Organizers; File Boxes; File Folders; Folders & Report Covers; Greeting Card Organizers; Mail Sorters; Pen & Pencil Cases; Portfolios & Padfolios; Recipe Card Boxes